Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB116.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2702(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended, subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph and subsection (d) is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 2702. Aggravated assault.(a) Offense defined.--A person is guilty of aggravated assault if he:* * *(3.1) attempts to cause or intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to an individual whom he knows or should know has an intellectual disability or an autism spectrum disorder;* * *123456789101112131415161718 (b) Grading.--Aggravated assault under subsection (a)(1), (2) and (9) is a felony of the first degree. Aggravated assault under subsection (a)(3), (3.1), (4), (5), (6), (7) and (8) is a felony of the second degree.* * *(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Autism spectrum disorder." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 5992 (relating to definitions), regardless of the age of the individual.* * *"Intellectual disability." R egardless of the age of the individual, significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning of an individual that is accompanied by significant limitations in adaptive functioning in at least two of the following skill areas:(1) Communication.(2) Self-care.(3) Home living.(4) Social and interpersonal.(5) Use of community resources.(6) Self-direction.(7) Functional academic.(8) Work.(9) Health and safety.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0116PN0094 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728